src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/noun-badass_unass_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Loanwords. Badly assmilated loan words and unassimilated loan words: 

Tests:

  Noun - adágio: # 
    adágio+N+Sg+Nom: adágio
    adágio+N+Sg+Acc: adágiov
    adágio+N+Sg+Com: adágiojn
    adágio+N+Sg+Ill: adágiuj
    adágio+N+Ess: adágion
    adágio+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: adágiusj
    adágio+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: adágiulasj    

  Noun - bolero: # 
    bolero+N+Sg+Nom: bolero
    bolero+N+Sg+Acc: bolerov
    bolero+N+Sg+Com: [bolerojn, bolerujn]
    bolero+N+Ess: boleron
    bolero+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bolerosj
    bolero+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: bolerolasj 

  Noun - byddja: # 
    byddja+N+Sg+Nom: byddja
    byddja+N+Sg+Acc: byddjav
    byddja+N+Sg+Com: byddjajn
    byddja+N+Ess: byddjan
    byddja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: byddjasj
    byddja+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: byddjalasj 

  Noun - klása: # 
    klása+N+Sg+Nom: klása
    klása+N+Sg+Acc: klásav
    klása+N+Sg+Com: klásajn
    klása+N+Ess: klásan
    klása+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: klásasj
    klása+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: klásalasj
    
    
